Washington statutes.
RCW 18.200.005

Intent—Purpose—1997 c 285.

It is the intent of the legislature that this act accomplish the following: Safeguard public health, safety, and welfare; protect the public from being mislead by unethical, ill-prepared, unscrupulous, and unauthorized persons; assure the highest degree of professional conduct on the part of orthotists and prosthetists; and assure the availability of orthotic and prosthetic services of high quality to persons in need of the services. The purpose of this act is to provide for the regulation of persons offering orthotic and prosthetic services to the public.

[ 1997 c 285 s 1.]